Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVI Motor Vehicles
CHAPTER 186A Automated Motor Vehicle Registration System
186A.070.
Registration and title requirements for vehicles, manufactured homes, or trailers.

Except as otherwise provided, the state resident owner of a vehicle as defined in KRS 186.010(8)(a), manufactured home as defined in KRS

186.650

, or trailer which will not be operated upon the highways of this state shall within fifteen (15) days apply for and obtain a certificate of title in his name. He shall not, however, be required to obtain a certificate of registration until the vehicle, manufactured home, or trailer is to be operated upon the highways of this state.

On or after July 1, 2010, any state resident who purchases an all-terrain vehicle as defined in KRS

189.010

shall apply for and obtain a certificate of title in the purchaser’s name within fifteen (15) days of purchase. The owner of an all-terrain vehicle shall not be eligible to obtain a certificate of registration pursuant to KRS

186.020

.

On or after July 1, 2010, any state resident who owns an all-terrain vehicle and creates a security interest on that vehicle shall be required to obtain a certificate of title within fifteen (15) days of the creation of the security interest. The perfection and discharge of the security interest shall be governed by KRS

186A.190

,

186A.193

,

186A.195

,

186A.200

,

186A.205

,

186A.210

, and

186A.215

. The owner of an all-terrain vehicle shall not be eligible to obtain a certificate of registration pursuant to KRS

186.020

.

An all-terrain vehicle shall not be operated upon the roadways of this state, except in accordance with KRS

189.515

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 164, § 11, effective July 15, 1982; 1988, ch. 132, § 1, effective March 31, 1988; 1994, ch. 42, § 9, effective July 15, 1994; 2009, ch. 64, § 2, effective June 25, 2009.

186A.072.
Titling of custom-built motorcycles.

As used in KRS

186A.115

and this section, “custom-built motorcycle” means a motorcycle as defined in KRS 186.010(15) that has been built from one hundred percent (100%) new parts to the individual specifications of:

The individual who built the motorcycle who will personally use the motorcycle;

A specific known prospective owner of the motorcycle who is purchasing the motorcycle at retail; or

A person engaged in the business of building and selling motorcycles who is building the motorcycle for purposes of retail sale to an unknown buyer.

A person who has either personally custom-built a motorcycle or who has purchased a custom-built motorcycle shall be issued a first certificate of title after complying with the provisions of this subsection. The person shall, prior to applying for the certificate of title, apply to the Transportation Cabinet for a vehicle identification number under the provisions of KRS

186A.090

. When applying for a first certificate of title for a custom-built motorcycle, the person shall apply in the office of the county clerk of the county in which he or she resides and provide the clerk with the following:

Written documentation authenticating that one hundred percent (100%) of the parts used to assemble the custom-built motorcycle are new parts purchased from either a wholesale or retail supplier that have never been used;

Proof of insurance to comply with the provisions of KRS

304.39-080

; and

Other information that may be required by the Transportation Cabinet in an administrative regulation promulgated under KRS Chapter 13A. If the cabinet fails to promulgate an administrative regulation governing custom-built motorcycles, the only documentation a person applying for a first certificate of title for a custom-built motorcycle shall be required to present to the county clerk is the information required under paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection.

The Transportation Cabinet shall not classify a custom-built motorcycle as a salvage or rebuilt vehicle and shall not subject a custom-built motorcycle to the provisions of this chapter governing salvage or rebuilt vehicles.

History.

Enact. Acts 2003, ch. 97, § 2, effective June 24, 2003.

186A.073.
Titling of military surplus vehicle.

As used in this section, “military surplus vehicle” has the same meaning as in KRS

186.010

.

A person who has purchased a military surplus vehicle shall be issued a certificate of title after complying with the provisions of this section.

An owner of a military surplus vehicle that does not have a vehicle identification number shall, prior to applying for a certificate of title, apply to the Transportation Cabinet for a vehicle identification number under KRS

186A.090

.

When applying for a certificate of title for a military surplus vehicle, the owner shall apply in the office of the county clerk of the county in which he or she resides and provide the clerk with the following:

Proof of insurance to comply with KRS

304.39-080

;

Proof that the military surplus vehicle has passed an inspection in accordance with KRS

186A.115

; and

Any other information that may be required by the Transportation Cabinet in an administrative regulation promulgated under KRS Chapter 13A.

The Transportation Cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A to implement this section.

HISTORY:

2017 ch. 55, § 1, effective June 29, 2017.

186A.074.
Titling of all-terrain vehicles.

As used in this section, “all-terrain vehicle” has the same meaning as in KRS

189.010

.

The titling of all-terrain vehicles shall be administered through the automated motor vehicle and trailer registration and titling system developed and implemented under KRS

186A.010

.

The Transportation Cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A requiring the procedures for titling of all-terrain vehicles to be consistent as far as practicable with motor vehicle titling. These regulations may pertain but shall not be limited to the following:

Conditions and characteristics of certificate of title forms;

Comparison and identification of identification or serial numbers of all-terrain vehicles;

Application for title;

Processing of title applications;

Form of certificate of title;

Notation of security interests on title;

Title lien statements;

Transfer of all-terrain vehicle ownership; and

Duplicate certificate of title.

The Transportation Cabinet shall ensure that the automated motor vehicle and trailer registration and titling system is capable of receiving and discharging a lien associated with the owner of an all-terrain vehicle. An all-terrain vehicle dealer shall not be responsible for the payment of a lien on an all-terrain vehicle which is received as trade-in or otherwise obtained by the dealer.

History.

Enact. Acts 2009, ch. 64, § 1, effective June 25, 2009.

186A.075.
Motor vehicle titles — When to be effective — Governor may extend effective date by executive order. [Repealed.]

186A.080.
Motor vehicles exempt from title and registration requirements. [Effective until January 1, 2024]

No Kentucky certificate of registration, license plate, or certificate of title need be applied for or obtained for:

A vehicle owned by the United States unless it is registered in this state;

A vehicle owned by a nonresident of this state, principally operated in another state, properly and currently registered and titled in another state;

A vehicle regularly engaged in the interstate transportation of persons or property for which a currently effective lawful certificate of title has been issued in another state;

A vehicle moved solely by animal power;

An implement of husbandry;

Special mobile equipment;

A self-propelled wheelchair or invalid tricycle;

A pole trailer;

A motor vehicle engaged in the transportation of passengers for hire operating under a currently valid certificate of convenience and necessity;

A moped; and

An electric low-speed scooter as defined in KRS

189.010

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 164, § 13, effective July 15, 1982; 2019 ch. 22, § 2, effective June 27, 2019.

186A.080.
Motor vehicles exempt from title and registration requirements. [Effective January 1, 2024]

No Kentucky certificate of registration, license plate, or certificate of title need be applied for or obtained for:

A vehicle owned by the United States unless it is registered in this state;

A vehicle owned by a nonresident of this state, principally operated in another state, properly and currently registered and titled in another state;

A vehicle regularly engaged in the interstate transportation of persons or property for which a currently effective lawful certificate of title has been issued in another state;

A vehicle moved solely by animal power;

An implement of husbandry;

Special mobile equipment;

A self-propelled wheelchair or invalid tricycle;

A pole trailer;

A moped; and

An electric low-speed scooter as defined in KRS

189.010

.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 164, § 13, effective July 15, 1982; 2019 ch. 22, § 2, effective June 27, 2019; 2022 ch. 18, § 17, effective January 1, 2024.

186A.085.
Prerequisites to acceptance of application for title.

No county clerk shall accept an application for a certificate of registration or title, or license plate, unless the vehicle bears an apparently legitimate vehicle identification number, and if required, an apparently legitimate motor and frame number, as indicated by an owner’s application.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 164, § 14, effective July 15, 1982.

186A.090.
Owner to secure proper vehicle identification number from department.

The owner of a vehicle required to be titled or registered in this state which:

Does not have a legitimate vehicle identification number as affixed by a manufacturer regularly engaged in the original manufacture of the type vehicle for which registration is sought, or in accordance with the law of this or another state; or

Has been built from parts;

shall, before making application for registration of the vehicle, apply to the Department of Vehicle Regulation for issuance of a vehicle identification number plate, which shall be affixed to the vehicle in the manner prescribed by administrative regulations of the Department of Vehicle Regulation.

The Department of Vehicle Regulation shall establish, in cooperation with the Department of Kentucky State Police, regulations governing the form of application required by this section, and may require inspection of the vehicle before a vehicle identification number plate has been issued and after such plate has been affixed to the vehicle.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 164, § 15, effective July 15, 1982; 2007, ch. 85, § 204, effective June 26, 2007.

Opinions of Attorney General.

If the Automated Vehicle Information System does not have the technical capabilities to store more than two liens and there is no other place to store the information, then obviously the clerk cannot store the additional lien and will be responsible to file them in some other form as well as filing them in the same manner as lis pendens are filed.

OAG 84-81

.

186A.095.
Time for application for registration and title on vehicle imported into Commonwealth.

An owner of a vehicle for which a certificate of registration or title, and license plate must be obtained shall be allowed a fifteen (15) day grace period from the date on which he purchased a vehicle or brings a vehicle into the Commonwealth from another state, during which time the owner shall apply for and obtain motor vehicle insurance pursuant to KRS

304.39-080

, a certificate of registration or title, and a license plate in his name.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 164, § 16, effective July 15, 1982; 1996, ch. 341, § 2, effective July 15, 1996.

186A.097.
Registration of imported motor vehicles — Transfer of title — Inspection of vehicle.

No county clerk shall accept an initial application for a certificate of registration or title, or license plate, from an importer of a motor vehicle not manufactured for sale or distribution in the United States unless the importer of such a vehicle shall furnish to the county clerk of the county where the vehicle is sought to be titled or registered the following:

A manufacturer’s certificate of origin in the English language issued by the actual vehicle manufacturer;

The original documents constituting valid proof of ownership in the country in which the vehicle was originally purchased, together with a complete translation of the documents into the English language verified as to accuracy of the translation by affidavit of a competent translator; or

In the case of a vehicle imported from a country that cancels the vehicle registration and title for export, the documents assigned to the vehicle after the registration and title have been canceled, together with a complete translation of the documents into the English language, verified as to accuracy of the translation by affidavit of the translator.

Upon the initial transfer of a vehicle not manufactured for sale or distribution in the United States by an importer of a vehicle, or upon registration of such a vehicle by the importer for their own use, no county clerk shall accept an application for certificate of registration or title or license plate until the following information is provided:

A bond release letter, with all attachments, issued by the United States Department of Transportation acknowledging receipt of a statement of compliance submitted by the importer of the vehicle and that the statement meets the safety requirements of 19 C.F.R. 12.80 (e);

A bond release letter, with all attachments, issued by the United States Environmental Protection Agency stating that the vehicle has been tested and shown to be in conformity with federal emission requirements;

A receipt or certificate issued by the United States Department of Treasury showing that any and all gas guzzler taxes due on the vehicle under the provision of Public Law 95-618, Title II, Section 201(a), (26 U.S.C. Sec. 4064), have been fully paid; and

True and accurate copies of all documents, photographs, reports and all other records submitted to and used in obtaining United States customs bond release authorization from the United States Environmental Protection Agency and the United States Department of Transportation, and on which the authorization to release the bond was based.

Upon the initial transfer of a vehicle not manufactured for sale or distribution in the United States by an importer of a vehicle, or upon registration of such a vehicle by the importer for their own use, the applicant shall, before submitting his application to the county clerk, have the vehicle together with his application for title or registration and its supporting documents inspected by a certified inspector according to the provisions of the KRS

186A.115

. When requested to inspect a vehicle pursuant to this section, the certified inspector shall personally and physically inspect the vehicle, together with the application for title or registration, and its supporting documentation. He shall insure that the documents, photographs, reports and other records submitted to the United States Department of Transportation and the United States Environmental Protection Agency, upon which the decision to issue bond release authorization to the United States Customs Service was based, correspond with the vehicle he is physically inspecting, by matching such records with the following:

The vehicle identification number;

The engine serial number;

The make and model of the vehicle; and

Photographs of the vehicle (if submitted).

In lieu of the foregoing requirements, the applicant shall furnish to the county clerk proof satisfactory that the vehicle for which registration or title is sought was manufactured in the United States, or that such was lawfully imported into the United States by an authorized distributor from the manufacturer of the motor vehicle.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 69, § 1, effective July 15, 1986.

186A.100.
Application, procedure, and use for temporary motor vehicle registration.

A motor vehicle dealer licensed under KRS

186.070

who sells a vehicle for use upon the highways of this state shall equip the vehicle with a temporary tag executed in the manner prescribed below, which shall be valid for sixty (60) days from the date the vehicle is delivered to the purchaser. The cost of the tag shall be two dollars ($2), of which the clerk shall retain one dollar ($1). A motor vehicle dealer licensed under KRS

186.070

shall apply to the county clerk of the county in which the dealer maintains his principal place of business for issuance of temporary tags. Application shall be made for such tags on forms supplied to the county clerk by the Transportation Cabinet.

The county clerk of any county who receives a proper application for issuance of temporary tags shall record the number of each tag issued upon the application of the dealer for such tags, or if a group of consecutively numbered temporary tags are issued to a dealer in connection with a single application, record the beginning and ending numbers of the group on the application.

The clerk shall retain, for a period of two (2) years, one (1) copy of the dealer’s temporary tag application, and ensure that it reflects the numbers appearing on the tags issued with respect to such application.

If the owner of a motor vehicle submits to the county clerk a properly completed application for Kentucky certificate of title and registration pursuant to KRS

186A.120

, any motor vehicle required to be registered and titled in Kentucky, that is not currently registered and titled in Kentucky, may be equipped with a temporary tag, which shall be valid for sixty (60) days from the date of issuance, issued by the county clerk for the purpose of operating the vehicle in Kentucky while assembling the necessary documents in order to title and register the vehicle in Kentucky. The Transportation Cabinet may establish administrative regulations governing this section.

The county clerk may issue a temporary tag to the owner of a motor vehicle that is currently registered and titled in Kentucky. A temporary tag authorized by this subsection shall be used for emergency or unusual purposes as determined by the clerk for the purpose of maintaining the owner’s current registration. A temporary tag authorized by this subsection may only be issued by the county clerk and shall be valid for a period of between twenty-four (24) hours and seven (7) days, as determined is necessary by the clerk. A county clerk shall not issue a temporary tag authorized by this subsection unless the owner of the motor vehicle applying for the tag presents proof of motor vehicle insurance pursuant to KRS

304.39-080

. On and after January 1, 2006, if the motor vehicle is a personal motor vehicle as defined in KRS

304.39-087

, proof of insurance shall be determined by the county clerk as provided in KRS

186A.042

. A temporary tag issued pursuant to this subsection shall not be reissued by the county clerk for the same owner and same motor vehicle within one (1) year of issuance of a temporary tag.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 164, § 17, effective July 15, 1982; 1988, ch. 105, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1988, ch. 113, § 3, effective July 15, 1988; 1996, ch. 53, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 2004, ch. 130, § 9, effective July 13, 2004; 2007, ch. 27, § 1, effective June 26, 2007; 2011, ch. 5, § 3, effective January 1, 2013; 2022 ch. 113, § 1, effective July 14, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/12/2012).The amendment of this statute in
2011 Ky. Acts ch. 5 was to be effective January 1, 2013, pursuant to Section 7 of that Act. However, in
2012 Ky. Acts ch. 12, sec. 1,
2011 Ky. Acts ch. 5, sec. 7, was repealed, and a new effective date of January 1, 2014, was established for the 2011 amendment of this statute, pursuant to
2012 Ky. Acts ch. 12, sec. 2.

Subsection (4) of this section was created in 1988 Acts Ch. 105, Section 1, to provide for the issuance of a fifteen-day temporary tag by the county clerk for out-of-state vehicles being registered in Kentucky. Although this conformed with the existing fifteen-day temporary tag issued by dealers pursuant to (1), subsection (1) was later amended by 1988 Acts Ch. 113, Section 3, to extend the temporary tag period to thirty days. Inadvertently, in the later enactment, (4) was not amended to conform. Pursuant to
KRS

7.136

, the Reviser of Statutes has made a technical correction in order to make the subsections consistent

186A.105.
Information required for issuance of temporary registration.

Motor vehicle dealers, their agents and county clerks, before equipping a vehicle with a temporary tag, shall print or stamp in waterproof ink, legibly, in the spaces provided on such tag:

The month, day and year the vehicle was delivered to the purchaser;

The month, day and year of expiration of the tag which shall be no more than sixty (60) days following the date of delivery of the vehicle to the purchaser;

The purchaser’s or owner’s name;

The year model, make and vehicle identification number of the vehicle sold; and

Either the dealer’s name, city of principal place of business and the telephone number, including telephone area code, or the clerk’s name, county and telephone number, including area code.

The dealer’s employee who executes the temporary tag shall place his signature in the space provided. A dealer who issues, or whose agents issue, temporary tags shall keep a log of each temporary tag obtained and each tag issued, showing all information entered by the dealer or dealer’s agent on forms supplied by the cabinet, and shall make such log available for inspection by any law enforcement officer upon request. The log shall be retained by the dealer for a period of at least two (2) years following the date of issuance of the last dated tags whose issuance is indicated on any individual temporary tag log sheet.

The county clerk who executes the temporary tag shall place his signature in the space provided. A county clerk who issues temporary tags shall keep a log of each temporary tag obtained and each tag issued, showing all information entered by the county clerk on forms supplied by the cabinet, and shall make the log available for inspection by any law enforcement officer upon request. The log shall be retained by the county clerk for a period of at least two (2) years following the date of issuance of the last dated tags whose issuance is indicated on any individual temporary tag log sheet.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 164, § 18, effective July 15, 1982; 1988, ch. 105, § 2, effective July 15, 1988; 1998, ch. 565, § 3, effective July 15, 1998; 2022 ch. 113, § 2, effective July 14, 2022.

186A.110.
Liability for improper issuance of temporary registration.

Both the dealer and the dealer’s salesman or agent shall be liable for separate penalties for issuance of a temporary tag prior to sale of the vehicle on which the tag is placed by the dealer, for placement of a tag on a vehicle other than one purchased by the purchaser shown on such tag, for failure to fully execute as provided in this section a temporary tag which is placed upon a vehicle, and for failure to maintain the records required by KRS

186A.105

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 164, § 19, effective July 15, 1982.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Used car dealers who sell cars which have previously been registered in this state may not issue temporary tags for 15 days while permanent certificates of title and registration plates are obtained from the county clerk’s office.

OAG 84-149

.

There is no provision for equipping a motor vehicle which has been previously registered in this state with a temporary tag; the only vehicle which qualifies for a temporary tag is one which has not previously been registered in this state.

OAG 84-149

.

186A.115.
Inspection of motor vehicles and documents by certified inspector — Fee for certification of inspection — Reciprocity between counties — Modifications of military surplus vehicles — Administrative regulations — Exceptions — Inspection of historic vehicles.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, the owner of every vehicle brought into this state and required to be titled in this state shall, before submitting his or her application for title to the county clerk, have the vehicle together with his or her application for title and its supporting documents inspected by a certified inspector in the county in which the application for title is to be submitted to the county clerk.

An owner of a military surplus vehicle seeking title in this state shall, before submitting his or her application for title to the county clerk, have the vehicle together with his or her application for title and its supporting documents inspected by a certified inspector in the county in which the application for title is to be submitted to the county clerk.

For inspections under this section:

The certified inspector shall be certified through the Department of Vehicle Regulation following requirements set forth by the department by regulation and shall be designated by the county sheriff. The certified inspector will be held responsible for all certifications required pursuant to this chapter and will be liable for any and all penalties prescribed in this chapter, and shall be available during regular office hours at any and all offices and branches that issue applications for titles;

There shall be a five dollar ($5) fee for this certification, payable to the sheriff’s office, upon completion of certification;

There shall be an additional fee of ten dollars ($10) per trip when it becomes necessary for the certified inspector to travel to the site of the vehicle rather than bringing the vehicle to the sheriff’s inspection area; and

An inspection conducted in one (1) county within the Commonwealth of Kentucky under this subsection, and the fees paid for that inspection under this subsection, shall be honored by the certified inspector, sheriff, and county clerk in all other counties within this state. A second inspection shall not be required and additional fees shall not be required.

The Transportation Cabinet may require that modifications be made to a military surplus vehicle. Any modifications required by the cabinet under this section shall be made to the military surplus vehicle prior to its inspection.

The Transportation Cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A to implement the provisions of subsections (1)(b) and (3) of this section, including but not limited to vehicle modification requirements and the creation of a separate inspection form. The Transportation Cabinet shall note that military vehicles were originally manufactured under the federally mandated requirements set forth in 49 C.F.R. sec. 571.7 and shall only require these vehicles to meet applicable federal motor vehicle safety standards.

The following vehicles are excluded from the requirement of inspection by a certified inspector prior to titling in this state:

New motor vehicles sold by a dealer licensed in this state;

Vehicles required to be registered in this state by reason of lack of a reciprocity agreement with another state and for which a nonnegotiable registration document is to be issued;

Motor vehicles operated by a motor carrier under a nonnegotiable certificate or permit issued by the Department of Vehicle Regulation;

Motor vehicles owned by servicemen or servicewomen who are residents of Kentucky stationed outside of Kentucky may be inspected by the post provost or similar officer of the camp, post, or station. The post provost or similar officer shall submit an affidavit stating the name of the owner, the identification or serial number, the make, body style, current license or title number, if any, and state in which currently registered or titled, if any, of the motor vehicle;

Motor vehicles purchased in another state by persons who are residents of Kentucky but are temporarily residing out of state for at least thirty (30) days, but not longer than nine (9) months, may after the purchase of the vehicle be inspected by the state police, a local law enforcement agency, or the vehicle inspection program of another state. If an inspector in another state examines a vehicle under this paragraph, the purchaser may request the inspector to complete an affidavit stating the name of the owner, the vehicle identification number, the vehicle make and body style, the current state of registration, if any, and the current vehicle license or title number, if any. The Transportation Cabinet shall create an affidavit form containing at a minimum this information and shall post the form on the cabinet’s Internet Web site. A person using an inspector in another state under this paragraph shall comply with all requirements of that state’s inspection program, including payment of fees charged in that state. A person registering a motor vehicle for the first time in Kentucky under this paragraph shall transmit the application for registration, all supporting documentation, and payment for registration and usage tax to the county clerk of the county in which the person resides, and upon receipt of the appropriate documentation, the county clerk shall register the vehicle; and

Motor vehicles no longer located in Kentucky but which require inspection in order to issue a corrected Kentucky title due to error in vehicle identification or serial number may be inspected by an inspector authorized to inspect vehicle identification or serial number by the laws of the state or foreign country where application for a new title has been submitted.

When presented to a certified inspector for inspection or to a county clerk for processing, the owner’s application for a first certificate of registration or title in his or her name shall be accompanied by proof of insurance in compliance with KRS

304.39-080

and one (1) of the following documents as applicable:

If the vehicle is a new vehicle not previously registered in this state, the properly assigned manufacturer’s statement of origin for the vehicle for which registration or title is sought;

If the vehicle was last registered in this state, and is a vehicle for which a title is not required in this state, a certificate of registration, or if the vehicle is one for which a certificate of title is required in this state, a properly assigned certificate of title;

If the vehicle was last previously titled in another state, a properly assigned certificate of title;

If the application refers to a vehicle previously registered in another country, the documents of that country establishing ownership of the vehicle;

If the application refers to a vehicle last previously registered in another country by a person on active duty in the Armed Forces of the United States, the county clerk may accept on behalf of the Department of Vehicle Regulation evidence of ownership provided the applicant by the United States Department of Defense; and

Except as provided in KRS 186A.072(2)(c) governing custom-built motorcycles, if the application relates to a vehicle which has been specially constructed or reconstructed, that fact shall be stated in the application, and the application shall be accompanied by the documents specified by administrative regulations of the Department of Vehicle Regulation.

When requested to inspect a vehicle pursuant to this section, the certified inspector shall personally and physically inspect the vehicle, when registration or title is sought in this state, on the following points:

He or she shall ensure that the application is legible and properly executed to the extent required at the time of execution;

He or she shall compare the vehicle identification number as appearing on both the vehicle identification number plate, and the federal safety standards label of the vehicle which is sought to be registered or titled, with the corresponding number inscribed on the application, and its supporting documentation, and ensure that the vehicle identification number appearing at each described location appears legitimate and that they are consistent with each other;

He or she shall examine the primary odometer of the vehicle and legibly record the reading in the space provided in the inspection section of the application; and

After exercising due diligence in inspecting the vehicle, the application, and its supporting documentation, and finding that they appear to be in order, the certified inspector shall execute the preprinted certificate of inspection according to its terms by printing in the spaces provided his or her first name, middle initial, and last name, and his or her title; the name of the county in which he serves; and the telephone number including the telephone area code of his or her agency, and sign in ink his or her signature in the space provided, and print the month, day, and year in which his or her inspection was made, certifying under penalty of forgery in the second degree the character, accuracy, and date of his or her inspection.

The certified inspector shall refrain from executing the certificate of inspection if:

He or she has not personally and physically inspected the vehicle in accordance with this section;

He or she has reason to believe that the vehicle displays an unlawfully altered vehicle identification number;

The application and any of its copies are illegible or otherwise improperly executed, or contain information reasonably believed to be inaccurate or fraudulent;

The documentation required in support of any application is not present, or not consistent with the vehicle and the owner’s application or appears fraudulent; or

He or she has probable cause to believe the vehicle is stolen.

Inspections on motor vehicles that meet the definition of a “historic vehicle” under KRS 186.043(2) and are brought into this state shall be limited to verification of the vehicle identification number with supporting documentation for purposes of titling.

Inspections on motor vehicles that meet the definition of a classic motor vehicle project as set forth in KRS

186A.510

shall be limited to verification of the vehicle identification number with supporting documentation for purposes of issuing a classic motor vehicle project certificate of title under KRS 186A.535(1).

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 164, § 20, effective July 15, 1982; 1986, ch. 319, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1994, ch. 504, § 3, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 35, § 2, effective July 15, 1996; 1996, ch. 248, § 4, effective July 15, 1996; 2002, ch. 298, § 3, effective July 15, 2002; 2003, ch. 97, § 1, effective June 24, 2003; 2007, ch. 135, § 2, effective June 26, 2007; 2008, ch. 157, § 3, effective July 15, 2008; 2017 ch. 55, § 2, effective June 29, 2017.

186A.120.
Initial application for title and registration to be in county of residence of owner — Exceptions. [Effective until January 1, 2024]

Application for a first certificate of registration or title and plate, shall be made by the owner to the county clerk of the county in which he resides, except that, if a vehicle is purchased from a dealer other than in the county in which the purchaser for use resides, the purchaser, or the dealer on behalf of the purchaser, may make application for registration to the county clerk in either the county in which the purchaser resides, or in the county in which the dealer’s principal place of business is located.

When purchaser of a vehicle upon which a lien is to be recorded is a resident of a county other than that of the dealer, the application for registration or title may be made to the county clerk in either county. The lien must be recorded in the county of the purchaser’s residence.

If vehicle application for registration or title is presented to the county clerk of dealer’s location rather than purchaser’s residence, the clerk shall process documents in a manner similar to that of any application, with the exception that the AVIS system shall be programmed in a manner that the title shall not be issued from Frankfort until the lien information has been entered by the county clerk of the purchaser’s residence.

A new vehicle, when first registered or titled in this state, shall be registered or titled in the name of the first owner for use rather than in the name of a dealer who held the vehicle for sale.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a used vehicle not previously registered or titled in this state shall be registered or titled in the name of the first owner for use rather than in the name of a dealer who held the vehicle for resale.

If the owner of a vehicle required to be registered or titled in this state does not reside in the Commonwealth, the vehicle shall be registered or titled with the county clerk of the county in which the vehicle is principally operated.

If the owner of a vehicle is other than an individual and resides in the Commonwealth, the vehicle shall be registered or titled with the county clerk in either the county in which the owner resides or in the county in which the vehicle is principally operated.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 164, § 21, effective July 15, 1982.

186A.120.
Initial application for title and registration to be in county of residence of owner — Exceptions. [Effective January 1, 2024]

Except for applications for title using the electronic title application and registration system established under KRS

186A.017

, application for a first certificate of registration or title and plate shall be made by the owner to the county clerk of the county in which the owner resides, except that, if a vehicle is purchased from a dealer other than in the county in which the purchaser for use resides, the purchaser, or the dealer on behalf of the purchaser, may make application for registration to the county clerk in either the county in which the purchaser resides, or in the county in which the dealer’s principal place of business is located.

When purchaser of a vehicle upon which a lien is to be recorded is a resident of a county other than that of the dealer, the application for registration or title may be made to the county clerk in either county. The lien must be recorded in the county of the purchaser’s residence.

If vehicle application for registration or title is presented to the county clerk of dealer’s location rather than purchaser’s residence, the clerk shall process documents in a manner similar to that of any application, with the exception that the AVIS system shall be programmed in a manner that the title shall not be issued from Frankfort until the lien information has been entered by the county clerk of the purchaser’s residence.

A new vehicle, when first registered or titled in this state, shall be registered or titled in the name of the first owner for use rather than in the name of a dealer who held the vehicle for sale.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a used vehicle not previously registered or titled in this state shall be registered or titled in the name of the first owner for use rather than in the name of a dealer who held the vehicle for resale.

If the owner of a vehicle required to be registered or titled in this state does not reside in the Commonwealth, the vehicle shall be registered or titled with the county clerk of the county in which the vehicle is principally operated.

If the owner of a vehicle is other than an individual and resides in the Commonwealth, the vehicle shall be registered or titled with the county clerk in either the county in which the owner resides or in the county in which the vehicle is principally operated.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 164, § 21, effective July 15, 1982; 2022 ch. 18, § 4, effective January 1, 2024.